California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, mailing lists, if the contract regarding that mailing list restricts the purchaser to a single use of the mailing list.

(b) For purposes of this section, “mailing list” means a written or printed list, series, set, group, or aggregation of names and addresses of, and occasionally, other information concerning persons,
 including, but not limited to, potential customers or donors, that is intended for use in circulating material by mail. A mailing list may be in the form of a manuscript list, directory, Cheshire tape, Dick tape, gummed labels, index cards, or other similar means of communication. “Mailing list” also includes a magnetic tape or similar device used to produce written or printed names and addresses by electronic or mechanical means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

6380.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, qualified property for use in space flight.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified property” means any of the following:

(A) Tangible personal property that has space flight
 capability, including, but not limited to, an orbital space facility, space propulsion system, space vehicle, satellite, or space station of any kind, and any component thereof.

(B) Tangible personal property to be placed or used aboard any facility, system, vehicle, satellite, or station described in subparagraph (A), regardless of whether that property is to be ultimately returned to this state for subsequent use, storage, or other consumption.

(C) Fuel of a quality that is not adaptable for use in ordinary motor vehicles, but is produced, sold, and used exclusively for space flight.

(2) “Space flight” means any flight designed for suborbital, orbital, or interplanetary travel by a space vehicle, satellite, space facility, or space station of any kind.

(c) The exemption established by this section shall not be denied by reason of a failure, postponement, or cancellation of a launch of a space vehicle, satellite, space facility, or space station of any kind, or the destruction of any launch vehicle or any component thereof, but the exemption shall not apply to any material that is not intended to be launched into space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 323, Sec. 7.   Effective August 20, 1998.   Operative January 1, 1999, by Sec. 35 of Ch. 323.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions From Sales Tax [6381. - 6396.]

6381.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of any tangible personal property to:

(a) The United States, its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities;

(b) Any incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United States wholly owned by the United States or by a corporation wholly owned by the United States; 

(c) The American National Red Cross, its chapters and branches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6384.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law the tax imposed under this part shall apply to the gross receipts from the sale of any tangible personal property to contractors purchasing such property either as the agents of the United States or for their own account and subsequent resale to the United States for use in the performance of contracts with the United States for the construction of improvements on or to real property in this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

6385.

(a) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other than fuel and petroleum products, to a common carrier, shipped by the seller via the purchasing carrier’s facilities under a bill of lading whether the freight is paid in advance, or the shipment is made freight charges collect, to a point outside this state and the property is actually transported to the out-of-state destination for use by the carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier.

(b) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other
 than aircraft fuel and petroleum products, purchased by a foreign air carrier and transported by the foreign air carrier’s facilities to a foreign destination for use by the air carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier by air of persons or property. To qualify for this exemption, the foreign air carrier shall furnish to the seller a certificate in writing that the property shall be transported and used in the manner required in this subdivision. The certificate shall be substantially in the form prescribed by the department. A seller is not liable for the sales tax if the seller accepts the certificate in good faith. If the seller does not have the certificate at the time the department requests the seller to submit the certificate to the department, the seller shall be given a reasonable time to request the foreign air carrier to provide the seller with the certificate. The foreign
 air carrier shall maintain records in this state, such as a copy of a bill of lading, an air waybill, or cargo manifest, documenting its transportation of the tangible personal property to a foreign destination.

(c) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of fuel and petroleum products to a water common carrier for immediate shipment outside this state for consumption in the conduct of its business as a common carrier after the first out-of-state destination. To qualify for the exemption the common carrier shall furnish to the seller an exemption certificate in writing stating the quantity of fuel and petroleum products claimed as exempt which is to be consumed after reaching the first out-of-state destination. That certificate shall bear the purchaser’s valid seller’s permit
 number or valid fuel exemption registration number and shall be substantially in the form prescribed by the department. Acceptance in good faith of that certificate shall relieve the seller from liability for the sales tax.

(d) “First out-of-state destination,” as used in this section, means the first point reached outside this state by a common carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier at which cargo or passengers are loaded or discharged, cargo containers are added or removed, fuel is transferred, or docking fees are charged. “First out-of-state destination,” as used in this section, also includes the entry point of the Panama Canal when the carrier is only transiting the canal in the conduct of its business as a common carrier.

(e) “Common carrier,” as used
 in this section, with respect to water transportation, shall be deemed to include any vessel engaged, for compensation, in transporting persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce.

(f) “Foreign air carrier,” as used in this section, means a foreign air carrier as defined in Section 40102 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(g) “Immediate shipment,” as used in this section, means that the delivery of the fuel and petroleum products by the seller is directly into a ship for transportation outside this state and not for storage by the purchaser or any third party.

(h) A common carrier claiming exemption under subdivision (c) who is not required to hold a valid seller’s permit shall be required to
 register with the department and obtain a fuel exemption registration number and shall be required to file returns as the department may prescribe if either the department notifies the carrier that returns must be filed or the carrier is liable for taxes based upon consumption of fuel erroneously claimed as exempt under this section. A common carrier required to hold a fuel exemption registration number shall be subject to all applicable provisions of this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(i) A common carrier claiming an exemption under subdivision (c), upon request, shall make available to the department records, including, but not limited to, a copy of a log abstract or a cargo manifest, documenting its transportation of the fuel or petroleum product to an out-of-state destination
 and the amount claimed as exempt. If the carrier fails to provide these records upon request, the department may revoke the carrier’s fuel exemption registration number.

(j) The department may require any carrier claiming an exemption under this section and required to obtain a fuel exemption registration number to place with it that security as the department may determine pursuant to Section 6701.

(k) Pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), any use of the property by the purchasing carrier, other than that incident to the delivery of the property to the carrier and the transportation of the property by the carrier to the first out-of-state destination and subsequent use in the conduct of its business as a common carrier, or a failure of the carrier to document its
 transporting the property to the first out-of-state destination, shall subject the carrier to liability for payment of sales tax as if it were a retailer making a retail sale of the property at the time of that use or failure, and the sales price of the property to it shall be deemed to be the gross receipts from the retail sale.

(l) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following with respect to the exemption extended by the act adding this subdivision:

(1) The specific goal that the exemption will continue to achieve is to ensure fueling will continue to be a robust economic activity in the state and adhere to tax policy and rationale of first substantial use occurring out of state.

(2) Detailed performance indicators measuring whether the exemption meets the goal described in paragraph (1) are the following:

(A) The average monthly maritime fuel price at all domestic and international Pacific seaports.

(B) The average monthly maritime fuel price at California seaports.

(C) Maritime fuel deliveries at California seaports.

(3) On or before January 1, 2026, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall analyze the performance indicators described in paragraph (2) and shall report its findings, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature.

(m) This section shall remain in effect only until
 January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 293, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   (AB 543)   Effective October 8, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

6385.

(a) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other than fuel and petroleum products, to a common carrier, shipped by the seller via the purchasing carrier’s facilities under a bill of lading whether the freight is paid in advance, or the shipment is made freight charges collect, to a point outside this state and the property is actually transported to the out-of-state destination for use by the carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier.

(b) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other than aircraft fuel and petroleum products, purchased by a foreign air
 carrier and transported by the foreign air carrier’s facilities to a foreign destination for use by the air carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier by air of persons or property. To qualify for this exemption, the foreign air carrier shall furnish to the seller a certificate in writing that the property shall be transported and used in the manner required in this subdivision. The certificate shall be substantially in the form prescribed by the department. A seller is not liable for the sales tax if the seller accepts the certificate in good faith. If the seller does not have the certificate at the time the department
 requests the seller to submit the certificate to the
 department, the seller shall be given a reasonable time to request the foreign air carrier to provide the seller with the certificate. The foreign air carrier shall maintain records in this state, such as a copy of a bill of lading, an air waybill, or cargo manifest, documenting its transportation of the tangible personal property to a foreign destination.

(c) “Common carrier,” as used in this section, with respect to water transportation, shall be deemed to include any vessel engaged, for compensation, in transporting persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce.

(d) “Foreign air carrier,” as used in this section, means a foreign air carrier as defined in Section 40102 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(e) Pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), any use of the
 property by the purchasing carrier, other than that incident to the delivery of the property to the carrier and the transportation of the property by the carrier to an out-of-state destination and subsequent use in the conduct of its business as a common carrier, or a failure of the carrier to document its transporting the property to an out-of-state destination, shall subject the carrier to liability for payment of sales tax as if it were a retailer making a retail sale of the property at the time of that use or failure, and the sales price of the property to it shall be deemed to be the gross receipts from the retail sale.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 293, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   (AB 543)   Effective October 8, 2023.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6386.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale in this state of tangible personal property to a holder of a valid seller’s permit issued under Section 6067 when the property is used by the purchaser outside of this state in his performance of a contract to improve real property and, as a result of such use, is incorporated into and becomes a part of real property located outside of this state. This exemption shall apply only if the purchaser certifies in writing to the seller, in such form as the board may prescribe, that the property will be used in a manner and for a purpose herein specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

6387.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property purchased for use solely outside this State and delivered to a forwarding agent, export packer, or other person engaged in the business of preparing goods for export or arranging for their exportation, and actually delivered to a port outside the continental limits of the United States prior to making any use thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

6388.

Where a new or remanufactured truck, truck tractor, semitrailer, or trailer, any of which has an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or more, or a new or remanufactured trailer coach or a new or remanufactured auxiliary dolly, is purchased from a dealer located outside this state for use without this state and is delivered by the manufacturer or remanufacturer to the purchaser within this state, and the purchaser drives or moves the vehicle from the manufacturer’s or remanufacturer’s place of business in this state to any point outside this state within 30 days from and after the date of the delivery, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part
 the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use or other consumption of the vehicle within the state, if the purchaser furnishes the following to the manufacturer or remanufacturer:

(a) Written evidence of an out-of-state registration for the vehicle.

(b) The purchaser’s affidavit attesting that he or she is not a resident of California and that he or she purchased the vehicle from a dealer at a specified location without the state for use outside this state.

(c) The purchaser’s affidavit that the vehicle has been moved or driven to a point outside this state within 30 days of the date of the delivery of the vehicle to him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6388.3.

The State Board of Equalization shall prepare and distribute a standard form or forms for the purchaser affidavit required by Sections 6388 and 6388.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1152, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6388.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6388, if a new, used, or remanufactured truck or a new, used, or remanufactured trailer or semitrailer, any of which has an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or more that has been manufactured or remanufactured outside this state is purchased for use without this state and is delivered by the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to the purchaser within this state, and the purchaser drives or moves the vehicle to any point outside this state within 30 days from and after the date of delivery, or whenever a new, used, or remanufactured truck or a new, used,
 or remanufactured trailer or semitrailer, any of which has an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or more that has been manufactured or remanufactured in this state is purchased for use without this state and is delivered by the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to the purchaser within this state, and the purchaser drives or moves the vehicle to any point outside this state within 75 days from and after the date of delivery, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption of the vehicle within the state, if the purchaser or the purchaser’s agent furnishes all of the following to the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer:

(1) (A) Written evidence of an out-of-state license and registration for the vehicle.

(B) If the vehicle is subject to the permanent trailer identification plate program under Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code and is used exclusively in interstate or foreign commerce, or both, written evidence of the purchaser’s or lessee’s United States Department of Transportation number or Unified Carrier Registration System filing may be substituted for the written evidence described in subparagraph (A).

(C) If the vehicle is registered under the International Registration Plan pursuant to Section 8052 of the Vehicle Code and is used exclusively in interstate or foreign commerce, or both, written evidence of the purchaser’s or lessee’s United States Department of Transportation
 number or Unified Carrier Registration System filing may be substituted for the written evidence described in subparagraph (A).

(2) The purchaser’s affidavit attesting that the purchaser purchased the vehicle from a dealer at a specified location for use exclusively outside this state, or exclusively in interstate or foreign commerce, or both.

(3) The purchaser’s affidavit that the vehicle has been moved or driven to a point outside this state within the appropriate period of either 30 days or 75 days of the date of the delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser.

(b) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, the Legislature declares the following with respect to the extension of the exemption by this section and
 the application of this section to the sale of a used trailer or semitrailer:

(1) (A) The goal of this section, as amended by Chapter 226 of the Statutes of 2019 and the act adding this subdivision, is to bring, and continue to bring, parity to the law regulating interstate commerce and to allow commercial trucks to meet the same requirements as commercial trailers that are purchased in the state for use either entirely outside the state or strictly in interstate commerce.

(B) The goal of this section, as amended by the act adding this subdivision, is also to bring parity to the law with respect to used trailers and semitrailers.

(2) The goal of this policy is to increase sales of commercial trucks
 and used trailers and semitrailers that have an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or more that will be used in interstate commerce.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 28) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   (AB 314)   Effective October 8, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 427.)
-------------------------------------------

6388.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6388, if a new or remanufactured trailer or semitrailer with an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or more that has been manufactured or remanufactured outside this state is purchased for use without this state and is delivered by the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to the purchaser within this state, and the purchaser drives or moves the vehicle to any point outside this state within 30 days from and after the date of delivery, or whenever a new or remanufactured trailer or semitrailer with an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds
 or more that has been manufactured or remanufactured in this state is purchased for use without this state and is delivered by the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to the purchaser within this state, and the purchaser drives or moves the vehicle to any point outside this state within 75 days from and after the date of delivery, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption of the vehicle within the state, if the purchaser or the purchaser’s agent furnishes all of the following to the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer:

(1) (A) Written evidence of an out-of-state license and registration for the vehicle.

(B) If the vehicle is subject to the permanent trailer identification plate program under Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code and is used exclusively in interstate or foreign commerce, or both, written evidence of the purchaser’s or lessee’s United States Department of Transportation number or Unified Carrier Registration System filing may be substituted for the written evidence described in subparagraph (A).

(2) The purchaser’s affidavit attesting that the purchaser purchased the vehicle from a dealer at a specified location for use exclusively outside this state, or exclusively in interstate or foreign commerce, or both.

(3) The purchaser’s affidavit that the vehicle has been moved or driven to a point outside this
 state within the appropriate period of either 30 days or 75 days of the date of the delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2029.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 29) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (AB 314)   Effective October 8, 2023.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6390.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the rentals payable under a lease of tangible personal property (a) when such rentals are required to be included in the measure of the use tax or (b) when such property is situated outside this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6391.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the rentals payable under a lease of tangible personal property for any period of time for which the lessor is obligated to lease the property for an amount fixed by the lease prior to August 1, 1965, and the lessor did not elect under Sections 6094 or 6244 to pay use tax measured by the amount of the rental charge. The lessor shall be deemed not to be obligated for any period of time for which he has the unconditional right to terminate the lease upon notice, whether or not the right is exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 832.)
-------------------------------------------

6396.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property which, pursuant to the contract of sale, is required to be shipped and is shipped to a point outside this state by the retailer by means of: (a) facilities operated by the retailer, or (b) delivery by the retailer to a carrier, customs broker or forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment to such out-of-state point.

For purposes of this section, the term “carrier” shall mean a person or firm engaged in the business of transporting
 for compensation tangible personal property owned by other persons, and includes both common and contract carriers. The term “forwarding agent” shall mean a person or firm engaged in the business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions From Use Tax [6401. - 6414.]

6401.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property, the gross receipts from the sale of which the purchaser establishes to the satisfaction of the board were included in the measure of the sales tax, is exempted from the use tax; provided, however, that this exemption does not extend to the possession of, or the exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property by a lessee under a lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

The storage, use or other consumption in this State of property purchased from any unincorporated agency or instrumentality of the United States, except (a) any property reported to the Surplus Property Board of the United States, or to any agency succeeding to the functions of that board, as surplus property by any owning agency and (b) any property included in any contractor inventory, is exempted from the use tax.

“Surplus property,” “owning agency,” and “contractor inventory” as used in this section have the meanings ascribed to them in that act of the Congress of the United States
 known as the “Surplus Property Act of 1944.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property donated by any seller to any organization described in Section 170(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code and located in California, is exempt from the use tax. A museum shall not be a qualifying donee organization under this section unless the museum is a nonprofit museum described in subdivision (c) of Section 6366.4, and uses the donated property exclusively for display purposes within a museum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1387, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

(a) The loan by any retailer of any tangible personal property to any school district for an educational program conducted by the district is exempt from the use tax.

(b) The loan by any retailer of any motor vehicle to the University of California or to the California State University for the exclusive use in an approved driver education teacher preparation certification program conducted by the university or the state university is exempt from the use tax.

(c) The loan by any retailer of a motor
 vehicle to be used exclusively for driver training in an accredited private or parochial secondary school in a driver education and training program approved by the State Department of Education as a regularly conducted course of study is exempt from the use tax.

(d) The loan by any retailer of any motor vehicle to a veterans hospital or such other nonprofit facility or institution to provide instruction in the operation of specially equipped motor vehicles to disabled veterans is exempt from the use tax.

(e) If the retailer makes any other use of the property except retention, demonstration, or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business, the use is taxable to the retailer under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) as of the time the property is first so used, and the sales price of the property to the retailer is the measure of the
 tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

Notwithstanding Section 6246, the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of the first eight hundred dollars ($800) of tangible personal property purchased in a foreign country by an individual from a retailer and personally hand-carried into this state from the foreign country within any 30-day period is exempt from the use tax. This section shall not apply to property sent or shipped to this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

A credit shall be allowed against, but shall not exceed, the taxes imposed on any person by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of this part, by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 37021) of Part 17 of this division by reason of the storage, use, or other consumption of tangible personal property in this state to the extent that the person has paid a retail sales or use tax, or reimbursement therefor, imposed with respect to that property by any other state, political
 subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia prior to the storage, use, or other consumption of that property in this state. The credit shall be apportioned to the taxes against which it is allowed in proportion to the amounts of those taxes.

A credit, otherwise permitted by the foregoing provisions of this section, shall not be allowed against taxes which are measured by periodic payments made under a lease, to the extent that the taxes imposed by any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia were also measured by periodic payments made under a lease for a period prior to the storage, use, or other consumption of the property in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

(a) A credit shall be allowed against, but shall not exceed, the taxes imposed on any person by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of this part, by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) by reason of the storage, use, or other consumption of tangible personal property in this state to the extent that the person has paid a retail sales or use tax, or reimbursement therefor, imposed with respect to that property by any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia prior to the storage, use, or other consumption of that property in this state. The credit shall be apportioned to the taxes against which it is allowed in proportion to the amounts of those taxes.

(b) A credit shall be allowed against, but shall not exceed, the total sales taxes imposed on any retailer by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) of this part, by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.5
 (commencing with Section 7200), and by any ordinance enacted pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) with respect to a retail sale in this state of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely to the extent that the retailer has paid a retail sales tax imposed with respect to that digital product by any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia at the time of sale.

(c) A credit allowed by
 this section shall not be allowed against taxes that are measured by periodic payments made under a lease, to the extent that the taxes imposed by any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia were also measured by periodic payments made under a lease for a period before the storage, use, or other consumption of the property in this state.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 18.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

The possession of, or the exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property under a lease of such property is exempt from the use tax for any period of time for which the lessee is obligated to lease the property for an amount fixed by the lease prior to August 1, 1965. The lessee shall be deemed not to be obligated for any period of time for which he has the unconditional right to terminate the lease upon notice, whether or not the right is exercised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 832.)
-------------------------------------------

6408.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of medical health information literature purchased by any organization formed and operated for charitable purposes which qualifies for the exemption provided by Section 214 (known as the “welfare exemption”), which is engaged in the dissemination of medical health information, is exempted from the use tax; provided, however, that such purchases are made from a national office, or another branch of that national office, of the same organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of health and safety educational materials and insignia routinely sold in connection with health and safety and first aid classes, purchased or sold by any national organization formed and operated for charitable purposes which qualifies for the exemption provided by Section 214 (known as the “welfare exemption”), which is engaged in the dissemination of health and safety information, is exempted from the use tax; provided, however, that such purchases are made from a national office or another branch or chapter of such national office of the same organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of new or used trailers or semitrailers which involves the moving or operation laden of those trailers or semitrailers in accordance with a one-trip permit issued pursuant to Section 4003.5 of the Vehicle Code is exempted from the use tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1986.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 715.)
-------------------------------------------

6411.

(a) The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property becoming a component part of any railroad equipment in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving that railroad equipment outside of this state, and charges made for labor and services rendered with respect to that repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, are exempt from the use tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, “railroad equipment” includes locomotives, freight and
 passenger cars, maintenance of way equipment, and any other equipment riding on flanged wheels and owned or used by a common carrier engaged in interstate or foreign commerce, or by any person for the purpose of leasing that equipment to a common carrier engaged in interstate or foreign commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6414.

(a) The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product shall be exempt from the use tax in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product is donated by a cannabis retailer licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to a medicinal cannabis patient.

(2) The medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product is donated by a person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to a cannabis retailer for subsequent donation to a medicinal
 cannabis patient.

(b) (1) The exemption specified in subdivision (a) shall apply only if the cannabis retailer certifies in writing to the licensee that donates the medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product, in such a form as the department may prescribe, that the medicinal cannabis and medicinal cannabis product will be used in a manner and for a purpose specified in subdivision (a). The licensee that donates the medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product shall keep a copy of the certification for no less than seven years. The certification in writing shall relieve the licensee that donates the medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product of liability for use tax only if it is taken in good
 faith.

(2) If a licensee uses the donated medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis product in some manner or for some purpose other than those specified in subdivision (a), the licensee shall be liable for the payment of use tax, the measure of tax to the licensee shall be deemed that licensee’s purchase price for similar product, and the licensee shall be subject to having their license suspended by the Department of Cannabis Control pursuant to Section 26031 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) “Medicinal cannabis” and “medicinal cannabis product” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) “Cannabis retailer” shall have the same meaning as that
 term is defined in Section 34010.

(e) “Medicinal cannabis patient” shall mean a qualified patient, as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, who possesses a physician’s recommendation that complies with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a qualified patient or primary caregiver for a qualified patient issued a valid identification card pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 920, Sec. 1.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------


